Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2529
Temporary and emergency elevator mechanic thirty-day licenses.

The commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations establishing standards and procedures for the issuance of temporary and emergency elevator mechanic thirty-day licenses and for the extension of such licenses for good cause shown.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 29.